CONTENT_1:

CONTENT_2:

CONTENT_3:
The large majority of our revenues have come from our server virtualization products. Although we continue to develop other applications for our virtualization technology such as our network virtualization solution, VMware NSX, end-user computing products and hybrid cloud services and expand our offerings into related areas such as our vRealize SDDC management products and vCloud product suites, we expect that our server virtualization products and related enhancements and upgrades will constitute a majority of our revenues for the foreseeable future. Declines and variability in demand for our data center virtualization products could occur as a result of:&#8226;improved products or product versions being offered by competitors in our markets;&#8226;competitive pricing pressures;&#8226;failure to timely execute and implement our product strategy, which could lead to quality issues, integration issues with ecosystem partners, and difficulties in creating and marketing suites of interoperable solutions;&#8226;failure to release new or enhanced versions of our server virtualization products on a timely basis, or at all;&#8226;technological change that we are unable to address with our server virtualization and private cloud products or that changes the way enterprises utilize our products; and&#8226;general economic conditions.Also, as more and more businesses achieve the virtualization of their servers, certain markets for our VMware vSphere product line have matured. Our sales of standalone VMware vSphere have declined as a portion of our overall business as we seek to transition our customers to product suites, our newer products and infrastructure-as-a-service offerings. If we fail to introduce compelling new features in future upgrades to our VMware vSphere product line, manage the transition to hybrid cloud platforms, develop new applications for our virtualization technology or provide product suites based on the VMware vSphere platform that address customer requirements for integration, automation and management of their IT systems, overall demand for products and services based on VMware vSphere may decline.Due to our product concentration, our business, financial condition, results of operations, and cash flows would therefore be adversely affected by a decline in demand for our data center virtualization products.12Table of Contents
CONTENT_4:
The virtualization, cloud computing, end-user computing and software-defined data center industries are inter-related and rapidly evolving. We experienced increased competition during 2014 and expect it to remain intense going forward. For example, Microsoft continues to improve its virtual infrastructure and virtual management products and is expected to release updated versions of its Hyper V virtualization product and CloudOS private cloud platform. Microsoft also offers IaaS capabilities in Azure with a similar hybrid cloud message. We also face competition from other companies that have announced a number of new product initiatives, alliances and consolidation efforts. For example, Citrix Systems continues to enhance its end-user desktop and mobility offerings and their networking and cloud platform offerings. IBM, Google and Amazon have existing cloud computing offerings and announced new cloud computing initiatives. Additionally, open source technologies for virtualization, containerization, and cloud platforms such as Xen, KVM, Docker, Rocket, and OpenStack provide significant pricing competition, and enable competing vendors to leverage open source technologies like OpenStack to compete directly with our SDDC initiative. Enterprises and service providers have also shown significant interest in building their own clouds based on open source projects such as OpenStack. Other companies have indicated their intention to expand offerings of virtual management and cloud computing solutions as well. Additionally, our hybrid cloud computing offering, which allows enterprises to pool internal and external IT resources running on a common vSphere infrastructure, competes with low-cost public cloud infrastructure offerings such as Amazon Web Services, Microsoft Azure, IBM SoftLayer and&#160;Google Compute Engine.Following our acquisition of Nicira and the resulting release of our NSX product, a number of competitors announced software-defined networking offerings. For example, Cisco announced its Application Centric Infrastructure initiative.We believe that the key competitive factors in the virtualization and cloud computing spaces include:&#8226;the level of reliability, security and new functionality of product offerings;&#8226;the ability to provide comprehensive and scalable solutions, including management and security capabilities;&#8226;the ability to offer products and services that support multiple hardware platforms, operating systems, applications and application development frameworks;&#8226;the ability to deliver an intuitive end-user experience for accessing data, applications and services from a wide variety of end-user devices;&#8226;the ability to effectively run traditional IT applications and emerging applications;&#8226;the proven track record of formulating and delivering a roadmap of virtualization and cloud computing capabilities;&#8226;the ability to attract and preserve a large installed base of customers;&#8226;pricing of products and services, individually and in bundles;&#8226;the ability to attract and preserve a large number of application developers to develop to a given cloud ecosystem;&#8226;the ability to create and maintain partnering opportunities with hardware vendors, infrastructure software vendors and cloud service providers;&#8226;the ability to develop robust indirect sales channels; and&#8226;the ability to attract and retain cloud, virtualization and systems experts as key employees.Existing and future competitors may introduce products and services in the same areas we serve or intend to serve, and competing products and services may have better performance, lower prices, better functionality and broader acceptance than our products and services. Our competitors may also add features to their virtualization, end-user and cloud computing products similar to features that presently differentiate our product offerings from theirs. Many of our current or potential competitors also have longer operating histories, greater name recognition, larger customer bases and significantly greater financial, technical, sales, marketing and other resources than we do. This competition could result in increased pricing pressure and sales and marketing expenses, thereby materially reducing our operating margins, and could also prevent our new products and services from gaining market acceptance, thereby harming our ability to increase, or causing us to lose, market share.Increased competition also may prevent us from entering into or renewing service contracts on terms similar to those that we currently offer and may cause the length of our sales cycle to increase. Additionally, some of our competitors and potential competitors supply a wide variety of products and services to, and have well-established relationships with, our current and prospective end users. For example, small to medium sized businesses and companies in emerging markets that are evaluating the adoption of virtualization-based technologies and solutions may be inclined to consider Microsoft solutions because of their existing use of Windows and Office products. Some of these competitors have in the past and may in the future take advantage 13Table of Contentsof their existing relationships to engage in business practices that make our products and services less attractive to our end users. Other competitors have limited or denied support for their applications running in VMware virtualization environments. These distribution, licensing and support restrictions, as well as other business practices that may be adopted in the future by our competitors, could materially impact our prospects regardless of the merits of our products and services. In addition, competitors with existing relationships with our current or prospective end users could in the future integrate competitive capabilities into their existing products and services and make them available without additional charge. For example, Oracle provides free server virtualization software intended to support Oracle and non-Oracle applications, and Microsoft offers its own server virtualization software packaged with its Windows Server product and offers built-in virtualization in the client version of Windows. As a result, existing and prospective VMware customers may elect to use products that are perceived to be &#8220;free&#8221; or &#8220;very low cost&#8221; instead of purchasing VMware products and services for certain applications where they do not believe that more advanced and robust capabilities are required. Competitors may also leverage open source technologies to offer zero or low cost products and services capable of putting pricing pressure on our own product offerings. By engaging in such business practices, our competitors can diminish competitive advantages we may possess by incentivizing end users to choose products that lack some of the technical advantages of our own offerings. In addition, even if customers find our products and services to be technically superior, they may choose to employ a &#8220;multiple-vendor&#8221;&#32;strategy, where they purposely deploy multiple vendors in their environment in order to prevent any one vendor from gaining too much control over their IT operations.We also face potential competition from our partners. For example, third parties currently selling our products and services could build and market their own competing products and services or market competing products and services of other vendors. If we are unable to compete effectively, our growth and our ability to sell products and services at profitable margins could be materially and adversely affected, which could materially and adversely impact our financial condition and results of operations.
CONTENT_5:
Some of our competitors have made acquisitions and entered into or extended partnerships or other strategic relationships to offer more comprehensive virtualization and cloud computing solutions than they individually had offered. Citrix Systems continues to invest in desktop virtualization marketing by continuing its collaboration with Microsoft and has acquired smaller players like Zenprise, Virtual Computer and Framehawk. IBM acquired SoftLayer to increase their data center footprint and grow their cloud business. Moreover, information technology companies are increasingly seeking to deliver top-to-bottom IT solutions to end users that combine enterprise-level hardware and software solutions to provide an alternative to our virtualization platform. For example, Oracle offers integrated hardware and software virtualization solutions, and Microsoft and Hewlett-Packard continue their collaboration based on Microsoft&#8217;s cloud computing and virtualization platforms. In addition, Citrix offers an IaaS cloud services solution, and Red Hat continues to invest in the Open Virtualization Alliance (&#8220;OVA&#8221;) to bolster KVM as a direct competitor to VMware vSphere. A number of competitors are active in the emerging software-defined networking space. For example, in 2013, Cisco acquired Insieme. In June 2013, Oracle and Microsoft entered into a partnership pursuant to which Oracle now supports the use of Oracle products in Microsoft Hyper-V deployments as well as Windows Azure. In July 2014, Cisco and Microsoft announced an initiative to integrate Cisco data center solutions and networking switches with Microsoft cloud offerings and to jointly market and sell their data center and hybrid cloud solutions. In September 2014, Cisco and RedHat announced a new integrated infrastructure solution for OpenStack-based cloud deployments. In addition, the companies announced an expansion of their relationship, accelerating collaboration around OpenStack, Application Centric Infrastructure and Intercloud. We expect these trends to continue as companies attempt to strengthen or maintain their positions in the evolving virtualization infrastructure and enterprise IT solutions industry. Many of the companies driving this trend have significantly greater financial, technical and other resources than we do and may be better positioned to acquire and offer complementary products and technologies. The companies and alliances resulting from these possible combinations may create more compelling product and service offerings and be able to offer greater pricing flexibility than we can or may engage in business practices that make it more difficult for us to compete effectively, including on the basis of price, sales and marketing programs (such as providing greater incentives to our channel partners to sell a competitor&#8217;s product), technology or product functionality. This competition could result in a substantial loss of customers or a reduction in our revenues, which could materially and adversely impact our financial condition and results of operations.
CONTENT_6:
Over the last several years, we have introduced new product and technology initiatives that aim to leverage our virtualization infrastructure software products into the emerging areas of cloud computing and end-user computing as alternatives to the provisioning of physical computing resources.One of our core strategies is to deliver the software-defined data center. In 2012, we acquired two companies that furthered our software defined data center (&#8220;SDDC&#8221;) strategy&#8212;Dynamic Ops, a provider of cloud automation solutions that enable 14Table of Contentsprovisioning and management of IT services across heterogeneous environments, and Nicira, a developer of software-defined networking and a leader in network virtualization for open source initiatives. In 2013, we acquired Virsto Software, a developer of software that optimizes storage performance and utilization in virtual environments. These acquired technologies, combined with existing technologies, constitute the basis for our SDDC private cloud offerings.We also continue to expand and enhance our end-user computing offerings, such as VMware View and Horizon Suite, a solution that provides end users with a single place to get access to their applications, data and desktops and gives IT a single management console to manage entitlements, policies and security. In the second quarter of 2013, we introduced our hybrid cloud service called vCloud Air (formerly, vCloud Hybrid Service). vCloud Air is designed to deliver a public cloud as a service offering that is interoperable with our customers&#8217; existing VMware virtualized infrastructure, enabling customers to extend the same skills, tools, networking and security models across both on-premise and off-premise environments. In the first quarter of 2014, we acquired AirWatch, a leader in enterprise mobility management and security solutions. The acquisition of AirWatch expands our portfolio of mobile solutions within the enterprise mobility and security space. In the third quarter of 2014, we announced that we had entered into a joint venture with the Softbank Group to expand our vCloud Air service to Japan. We are currently making significant investments in developing and introducing new technologies and product offerings related to our SDDC, vCloud Air and end-user and mobile computing initiatives.The expansion of our offerings to deliver the SDDC, address IT management and automation, add network and storage virtualization, and enhance our end-user computing capabilities and our hybrid cloud offerings subjects us to additional risks, such as the following:&#8226;These initiatives may present new and difficult technological challenges. Significant investments will be required to acquire and develop solutions to those challenges. Customers may choose not to adopt our new product or service offerings and we may be unable to recoup or realize a reasonable return on our investments.&#8226;Some of our new initiatives are hosted by third parties whom we do not control but whose failure to prevent service disruptions, or other failures or breaches may require us to issue credits or refunds or indemnify or otherwise be liable to customers or third parties for damages that may occur. Any transition of our services from a third party hosting service to our own data centers would also entail a risk of service disruption during a transition. We may be subject to claims if customers of these service offerings experience service disruptions or failures, security breaches, data losses or other quality issues. &#8226;The success of these new offerings depends upon the cooperation of hardware, software and cloud hosting vendors to ensure interoperability with our products and offer compatible products and services to end users. If we are unable to obtain such cooperation, it may be difficult and more costly for us to achieve functionality and service levels that would make our services attractive to end users.&#8226;We will need to develop and implement appropriate go-to-market strategies and train our sales force in order to effectively market offerings in product categories in which we may have less experience than our competitors. Accordingly, end users could choose competing products and services over ours, even if such offerings are less advanced than ours.&#8226;Our increasing focus on developing and marketing IT management and automation and infrastructure-as-a-service (including software-defined networking and vCloud Air) offerings that enable customers to transform their IT systems will require a greater focus on marketing and selling product suites and more holistic solutions, rather than selling on a product-by-product basis. Consequently, we will need to develop new strategies for marketing and selling our offerings, our customers&#8217; purchasing decisions may become more complex and require additional levels of approval and the duration of sales cycles for our offerings may increase.&#8226;We will need to develop appropriate pricing strategies for our new product initiatives. For example, it has frequently been challenging for software companies to derive significant revenue streams from open source projects, such as certain of our offerings. Additionally, in some cases our new product initiatives are predicated on converting free and trial users to paying customers of the premium tiers of these services, and therefore we must maintain a sufficient conversion ratio for such services to be profitable. Also, certain of our new product initiatives have a subscription model. We may not be able to accurately predict subscription renewal rates or their impact on results, and because revenue is recognized for our services over the term of the subscription, downturns or upturns in sales may not be immediately reflected in our results. Moreover, as customers transition to our hybrid cloud and SaaS products and services, our revenue growth rate may be adversely impacted, during the period of transition as we will recognize less revenue up-front than we would otherwise recognize as part of a multi-year license arrangement.15Table of Contents&#8226;The success of vCloud Air will depend on the successful global implementation of the offering and building effective go-to-market strategies. We will need to build sales expertise and infrastructure to support the new offering that is capable of meeting customer requirements for security, reliability and regulatory compliance. This hybrid cloud offering involves significant capital investment as well as technology risk, and may not be accepted by customers. Further, this offering may lead our team to reduce the time spent on selling our existing product portfolio, which could have a material negative impact on revenues. &#8226;As we expand our IaaS and SaaS offerings globally, we may rely more upon joint ventures with established providers of IT products and services in particular regions, such as our joint venture with the Softbank Group to expand our vCloud Air hybrid cloud service to Japan. Joint ventures require close ongoing cooperation and commitments from the joint venture partners, and the willingness to devote adequate resources as required. If we are unable to continue our strategic alignment with joint venture partners or obtain the cooperation and commitments we are relying upon, our ability to successfully expand our IaaS and SaaS offerings globally will diminish.&#8226;Our new products and services may compete with offerings from companies who are members of our developer and technology partner ecosystem. Consequently, we may find it more difficult to continue to work together productively on other projects, and the advantages we derive from our ecosystem could diminish.&#8226;The virtualized end-user computing industry remains in an emerging stage of expansion. Other companies are entering, and are developing competing standards for, the end-user computing space, such as Microsoft, Google, Amazon and Citrix, and such companies are likely to introduce their own initiatives that may compete with or not be compatible with our end-user computing initiatives, which could limit the degree to which other vendors develop products and services around our offerings and end users adopt our platforms.&#8226;The cloud computing industry is in early stages of expansion. Other companies are entering, and are developing competing standards for the cloud computing space, such as Microsoft, IBM, Cisco, Google and Amazon, as well as numerous vendor offerings based on the OpenStack project. These companies are likely to introduce their own initiatives that may compete with or not be compatible with our cloud initiatives, which could potentially limit the degree to which other vendors develop products and services around our offerings and end users adopt our platforms. &#8226;Emerging IT sectors, such as those within IaaS, are frequently subject to a &#8220;first mover&#8221; effect pursuant to which certain product and service offerings can rapidly capture a significant portion of market share and developer attention. Therefore, if competitive product and service offerings in these sectors gain broad adoption before ours, it may be difficult for us to displace such offerings regardless of the comparative technical merit, efficacy or cost of our products and services. &#8226;Developing and launching new technologies in new areas, as we are continuing to do with our VMware NSX virtual networking, Virtual SAN virtual storage and vCloud Air initiatives, requires significant investments of resources and often entails greater risk than incremental investments in existing industries. If these investments are not successful, our rate of growth may decline or reverse and our operating results will be negatively affected.&#8226;In connection with some of our product initiatives, including our web-based services, mobile services and our vCloud Air offering, we expect that our customers may increasingly use our services to store and process personal information and other regulated data, increasing our potential exposure to cybersecurity breaches and data loss.&#8226;Marketing and selling new technologies to enterprises requires significant investment of time and resources in order to educate customers on the benefits of our new product offerings. These investments can be costly and the additional effort required to educate both customers and our own sales force can distract from their efforts to sell existing products and services.As our vSphere-related products continue to mature, our future revenue growth is increasingly dependent on revenue from our new product and technology offerings. Our newer initiatives may be less profitable than our established products, and we may not be successful enough in these newer activities to recoup our investments in them. If any of these risks were to occur, it could damage our reputation, limit our growth and negatively affect our operating results.
CONTENT_7:
We launched our vCloud Air service offerings in 2013 in the United States and began to expand the services globally in 2014. Our vCloud Air offerings rely upon third-party providers to supply data center space, equipment maintenance and other colocation services. While we have entered into various agreements for the lease of data center space, equipment maintenance and other services, third parties could fail to live up to the contractual obligations under those agreements. For example, a data center landlord may fail to adequately maintain its facilities or provide an appropriate data center infrastructure for which it is 16Table of Contentsresponsible. If that were to happen, our ability to deliver services at levels acceptable to our customers and at levels that we have committed to could be impaired. Additionally, if the third parties that we rely on do fail to deliver on their obligations, our reputation could be damaged, our customers could lose confidence in us, and our ability to maintain and expand our vCloud Air offerings would be impaired.
CONTENT_8:
Our business depends on the overall demand for information technology and on the economic health of our current and prospective customers. The purchase of our products and services is often discretionary and may involve a significant commitment of capital and other resources. Weak economic conditions or significant uncertainty regarding the stability of financial markets could adversely impact our business, financial condition and results of operations in a number of ways, including by lengthening sales cycles, affecting the size of enterprise license agreements (&#8220;ELAs&#8221;) that customers will commit to, reducing the level of our non-ELA transactional sales, lowering prices for our products and services, reducing unit sales and reducing the rate of adoption of our products and services by new customers and the willingness of current customers to purchase upgrades to our existing products and services. For example, a recurrence of the sovereign debt crisis in Europe or that region&#8217;s failure to recover from recession would threaten to suppress demand and our customers&#8217; access to credit in that region, which is an important market for our products and services. Additionally, in response to sustained economic uncertainty, many national and local governments that are current or prospective customers for our products and services, including the U.S. federal government, have made, or threatened to make, significant spending cutbacks which could reduce the amount of government spending on IT and the potential demand for our products and services from the government sector.Regional economic uncertainty can also result in general and ongoing tightening in the credit markets, lower levels of liquidity, increases in the rates of default and bankruptcy and significant volatility in the credit, equity and fixed income markets. As a result, current or potential customers may be unable to fund software purchases, which could cause them to delay, decrease or cancel purchases of our products and services. Even if customers are willing to purchase our products and services, if they do not meet our credit requirements, we may not be able to record accounts receivable or unearned revenues or recognize revenues from these customers until we receive payment, which could adversely affect the amount of revenues we are able to recognize in a particular period.In addition, although we plan to continue making strategic investments in our business, many of our competitors have significantly greater financial, technical and other resources than we do, and to the degree that the economic recovery is anemic or not sustained, they may be better positioned to continue investment in competitive technologies.
CONTENT_9:
Our revenues, unearned revenues, and our collection of accounts receivable may be adversely impacted as a result of fluctuations in the exchange rates between the U.S. dollar and foreign currencies. For example, we have distributors in foreign countries that may incur higher costs in periods when the value of the U.S. dollar strengthens against foreign currencies. One or more of these distributors could delay payments or default on credit extended to them as a result. Any significant delay or default in the collection of significant accounts receivable could result in an increased need for us to obtain working capital from other sources. If we determine that the amount of accounts receivable that is uncollectible is greater than our estimates, we would recognize an increase in bad debt expense, which would have a negative impact on our results of operations. In addition, in periods when the value of the U.S. dollar strengthens, we may need to offer additional discounts, reduce prices or offer other incentives to mitigate the negative effect on demand.We invoice and collect in certain non-U.S. dollar denominated currencies, thereby conducting a portion of our transactions in currencies other than the U.S. dollar. Although this practice may alleviate credit risk from our distributors during periods when the U.S. dollar strengthens, it shifts the risk of currency fluctuations to us and may negatively impact our revenues, unearned revenues, anticipated cash flows and financial results due to fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates, particularly the euro, the British pound, the Japanese yen, the Australian dollar and the Chinese renminbi relative to the U.S. dollar. While variability in operating margin may be reduced due to invoicing in certain of the local currencies in which we also recognize expenses, increased exposure to foreign currency fluctuations will introduce additional risk for variability in revenue-related components of our consolidated financial statements. In 2014 approximately 30% of our sales were invoiced and collected in certain non-U.S. dollar denominated currencies.We enter into foreign currency forward contracts to hedge a portion of our net outstanding monetary assets and liabilities against movements in certain foreign exchange rates. Although we expect the gains and losses on our foreign currency forward contracts to generally offset the majority of the gains and losses associated with the underlying foreign-currency denominated 17Table of Contentsassets and liabilities that we hedge, our hedging transactions may not yield the results we expect. Additionally, we expect to continue to experience foreign currency gains and losses in certain instances where it is not possible or cost effective to hedge our foreign currency exposures. For example, we experienced a measurable negative impact to our revenues in the fourth quarter of 2014 due to exchange rate fluctuations and we expect a further negative impact to 2015 revenues and unearned revenues even if currency exchange rates stabilize. The further weakening of foreign currency exchange rates against the U.S. dollar would likely result in additional adverse impact on our revenues.
CONTENT_10:
The virtualization, cloud computing, end-user computing and SDDC industries are characterized by rapid technological changes, changing customer needs, frequent new software product introductions and evolving industry standards. The introduction of third-party solutions embodying new technologies and the emergence of new industry standards could make our existing and future software solutions obsolete and unmarketable. Cloud computing is proving to be a disruptive technology that will alter the way that businesses consume, manage and provide physical IT resources, applications, data and IT services. We may not be able to establish or sustain our thought leadership in the cloud computing and enterprise software fields, and our customers may not view our products and services as innovative and best-of-breed, which could result in a reduction in market share and our inability to command a pricing premium over competitor products and services. We may not be able to develop updated products and services that keep pace with technological developments and emerging industry standards and that address the increasingly sophisticated needs of our customers or that interoperate with new or updated operating systems and hardware devices or certify our products and services to work with these systems and devices. As a result, we may not be able to accurately predict the lifecycle of our software solutions, and they may become obsolete before we receive the amount of revenues that we anticipate from them. There is no assurance that any of our new offerings would be accepted in the marketplace. Significant reductions in server-related costs or the rise of more efficient infrastructure management software could also affect demand for our software solutions. As hardware and processors become more powerful, we will have to adapt our product and service offerings to take advantage of the increased capabilities. For example, while the introduction of more powerful servers presents an opportunity for us to provide better products for our customers, the migration of servers to microprocessors with an increasing number of multiple cores also allows an end user with a given number of licensed copies of our software to multiply the number of virtualization machines run per server socket without having to purchase additional licenses from us. If we are unable to revise our solutions and offerings in response to new technological developments, our ability to retain or increase market share and revenues in the virtualization software space could be materially adversely affected.
CONTENT_11:
Our operating results may fluctuate due to a variety of factors, many of which are outside of our control. As a result, comparing our operating results on a period-to-period basis may not be meaningful. Our past results should not be relied upon as an indication of our future performance. In addition, a significant portion of our quarterly sales typically occurs during the last month of the quarter, which generally reflects customer buying patterns for enterprise technology. As a result, our quarterly operating results are difficult to predict even in the near term. If our revenues or operating results fall below the expectations of investors or securities analysts or below any guidance we may provide to the market, the price of our Class A common stock would likely decline substantially.In addition, factors that may affect our operating results include, among others:&#8226;general economic conditions in our domestic and international markets and the effect that these conditions have on our customers&#8217; capital budgets and the availability of funding for software purchases;&#8226;fluctuations in demand, adoption rates, sales cycles and pricing levels for our products and services;&#8226;fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates;&#8226;changes in customers&#8217; budgets for information technology purchases and in the timing of their purchasing decisions;&#8226;the timing of recognizing revenues in any given quarter, which, as a result of software revenue recognition policies, can be affected by a number of factors, including product announcements, beta programs and product promotions that can cause revenue recognition of certain orders to be deferred until future products to which customers are entitled become available;&#8226;the sale of our products and services in the time frames we anticipate, including the number and size of orders in each quarter;&#8226;our ability to develop, introduce and ship in a timely manner new products and services and enhancements that meet customer demand, certification requirements and technical requirements;18Table of Contents&#8226;the introduction of new pricing and packaging models for our product offerings;&#8226;the timing of the announcement or release of upgrades or new products and services by us or by our competitors;&#8226;our ability to maintain scalable internal systems for reporting, order processing, license fulfillment, product delivery, purchasing, billing and general accounting, among other functions;&#8226;our ability to control costs, including our operating expenses;&#8226;changes to our effective tax rate;&#8226;the increasing scale of our business and its effect on our ability to maintain historical rates of growth;&#8226;our ability to attract and retain highly skilled employees, particularly those with relevant experience in software development and sales;&#8226;our ability to conform to emerging industry standards and to technological developments by our competitors and customers;&#8226;renewal rates and the amounts of the renewals for ELAs as original ELA terms expire;&#8226;the timing and amount of software development costs that may be capitalized beginning when technological feasibility has been established and ending when the product is available for general release;&#8226;unplanned events that could affect market perception of the quality or cost-effectiveness of our products and solutions; and&#8226;the recoverability of benefits from goodwill and acquired intangible assets, and the potential impairment of these assets.
CONTENT_12:
Our core customers are large enterprises with multi-year enterprise license agreements, each of which involves substantial aggregate fee amounts. The failure to renew those transactions in the future, at a dollar value at least equal to the original agreement, or to replace those enterprise license agreements with new transactions of similar scope, on terms that are commercially attractive to us could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, operating results and cash flow.
CONTENT_13:
Developing our products and services is expensive. Our investment in research and development may not result in marketable products or services or may result in products and services that take longer to generate revenues, or may generate less revenues, than we anticipate. Our research and development expenses were approximately 21%&#32;of our total revenues during both 2014&#32;and 2013. Our future plans include significant investments in software research and development and related product opportunities. We believe that we must continue to dedicate a significant amount of resources to our research and development efforts to maintain our competitive position. However, we may not receive significant revenues from these investments for several years, if at all.
CONTENT_14:
We sell our products and services through two primary means, which we refer to as our ELA and our non-ELA, or transactional, sales. ELAs are comprehensive&#160;long-term license agreements that provide for multi-year maintenance and support and constitute an increasing percentage of total overall sales. We believe that ELAs help us grow our business by building long-term relationships with our enterprise customers. In recent periods, 25% to 40%&#32;of our overall sales each quarter have been comprised of ELAs. These are generally larger size transactions, typically driven by our direct sales force and are primarily attractive to our larger enterprise customers. Transactional sales, in contrast, tend to be smaller in scope, shorter in duration with a standard one-year maintenance term, and are principally driven by our sales channel partners. Historically, they have represented 60% to 75% of our overall sales.Our year-over-year overall sales, ELA sales and our transactional sales all increased in 2014 compared to 2013. Although our transactional business has increased during 2014, as we develop and add new product and service capabilities to our higher-end product offerings, and as our ELA volume continues to grow, we may not be successful in our strategy to increase the value of the products and services sold through the transactional business. Consequently, we may not be able to increase sales 19Table of Contentsvolumes in our transactional business or help attract new customers to our product ecosystem with our enhanced product features and capabilities.If our overall go-to-market strategy is not successful, our growth rates may decline further, and&#160;our business, financial condition and results of operations could be materially adversely&#160;affected.
CONTENT_15:
The timing of our revenues is difficult to predict. Our sales efforts involve educating our customers about the use and benefit of our products and services, including their technical capabilities, potential cost savings to an organization and advantages compared to lower-cost products and services offered by our competitors. Customers typically undertake a significant evaluation process that has in the past resulted in a lengthy sales cycle which typically lasts several months, and may last a year or longer. We spend substantial time, effort and money on our sales efforts without any assurance that our efforts will produce any sales. In addition, product and service purchases are frequently subject to budget constraints, economic conditions, multiple approvals, and unplanned administrative, processing and other delays. Moreover, the greater number of competitive alternatives, as well as announcements by our competitors that they intend to introduce competitive alternatives at some point in the future, can lengthen customer procurement cycles, cause us to spend additional time and resources to educate end users on the advantages of our product and service offerings and delay product and service sales. Economic downturns and uncertainty can also cause customers to add layers to their internal purchase approval processes, adding further time to a sales cycle. Additionally, as we sell more products and services to domestic and foreign governments, we may encounter lengthier sales cycles, complicated budgeting processes and complex procurement regulations. These factors can have a particular impact on the timing and length of our ELA sales cycles and our overall sales during any particular fiscal period may have greater variability as a greater portion of our sales is made utilizing ELAs.Additionally, our quarterly sales have historically reflected an uneven pattern in which a disproportionate percentage of a quarter&#8217;s total sales occur in the last month, weeks and days of each quarter. Similarly, our yearly sales have historically reflected a disproportionate percentage of the year&#8217;s sales in the fourth fiscal quarter. These patterns make prediction of revenues, earnings and working capital for each financial period especially difficult and uncertain and increase the risk of unanticipated variations in financial condition and results of operations. We believe this uneven sales pattern is a result of many factors including the following:&#8226;the tendency of customers to wait until late in a quarter to commit to a purchase in the hope of obtaining more favorable pricing;&#8226;the fourth quarter influence of customers spending their remaining capital budget authorization prior to new budget constraints in the following year; and&#8226;seasonal influences, such as holiday or vacation periods.If sales expected from specific customers for a particular quarter are not realized in that quarter or at all, our results could fall short of public expectations and our business, financial condition and results of operations could be materially adversely affected.
CONTENT_16:
Our success depends largely upon the continued services of our existing management. We are also substantially dependent on the continued service of our key development personnel for product and service innovation and timely development and delivery of upgrades and enhancements to our existing products and services. The market for expert software developers upon whom we rely has become increasingly competitive. We generally do not have employment or non-compete agreements with our existing management or development personnel, and, therefore, they could terminate their employment with us at any time without penalty and could pursue employment opportunities with any of our competitors. Changes to management and key employees can also lead to additional unplanned losses of key employees. The loss of key employees could seriously harm our ability to release new products and services on a timely basis and could significantly help our competitors.
CONTENT_17:
To execute on our strategy, we must continue to attract and retain highly qualified personnel. Competition for these personnel is intense, especially for senior sales executives and engineers with high levels of experience in designing and developing software. We may not be successful in attracting and retaining qualified personnel. We have from time to time in the past experienced, and we expect to continue to experience in the future, difficulty in hiring and retaining highly skilled employees with appropriate qualifications. Many of the companies with which we compete for experienced personnel have 20Table of Contentsgreater resources than we have. Research and development personnel are also aggressively recruited by startup and emerging growth companies, which are especially active in many of the technical areas and geographic regions in which we conduct product and service development. In addition, in making employment decisions, particularly in the high-technology industry, job candidates often consider the value of the stock-based compensation they are to receive in connection with their employment. Declines in the value of our stock could adversely affect our ability to attract or retain key employees and result in increased employee compensation expenses. If we fail to attract new personnel or fail to retain and motivate our current personnel, our business and future growth prospects could be severely harmed.
CONTENT_18:
If we are unable to develop new products and services, integrate acquired products and services, enhance and improve our products and support services in a timely manner, or position or price our products and services to meet market demand, customers may not buy new software licenses from us, update to new versions of our software or renew product support. In addition, information technology standards from both consortia and formal standards-setting forums as well as de facto marketplace standards are rapidly evolving. We cannot provide any assurance that the standards on which we choose to develop new products and services will allow us to compete effectively for business opportunities in emerging areas such as cloud computing.New product and service development and introduction involve a significant commitment of time and resources and is subject to a number of risks and challenges including:&#8226;managing the length of the development cycle for new products and services and product and service enhancements, which has frequently been longer than we originally expected;&#8226;increasing complexity of our product offerings as we introduce product suites such as our vCloud Suite, which can significantly increase the development time and effort necessary to achieve the interoperability of product suite components while maintaining product quality;&#8226;growth rates of our emerging products and services may be negatively impacted despite their technical merit by the need to package such products and services in more complex product suite offerings that require more time for customer evaluation and purchase decisions;&#8226;managing customers&#8217; transitions to new products and services, which can result in delays in their purchasing decisions;&#8226;adapting to emerging and evolving industry standards and to technological developments by our competitors and customers;&#8226;entering into new or unproven markets with which we have limited experience;&#8226;reacting to trends and predicting which technologies will be successful and develop into industry standards;&#8226;tailoring our business and pricing models appropriately as we enter new markets and respond to competitive pressures and technological changes;&#8226;incorporating and integrating acquired products and technologies; and&#8226;developing or expanding efficient sales channels.In addition, if we cannot adapt our business models to keep pace with industry trends, our revenues could be negatively impacted. For example, if we increase our adoption of subscription-based pricing models for our products, we may fail to set pricing at levels appropriate to maintain our revenue streams or our customers may choose to deploy products from our competitors that they believe are priced more favorably. Additionally, we may fail to accurately predict subscription renewal rates or their impact on results of operations, and because revenues from subscriptions is recognized for our services over the term of the subscription, downturns or upturns in sales may not be immediately reflected in our results. As we offer more products that depend on converting users of free services to users of premium services and as such services grow in size, our ability to maintain or improve and to predict conversion rates will become more important.
CONTENT_19:
We increasingly depend upon our IT systems to conduct virtually all of our business operations, ranging from our internal operations and product development activities to our marketing and sales efforts and communications with our customers and business partners. Unauthorized parties have attempted to penetrate our network security and our website. Such cyberattacks 21Table of Contentsthreaten to misappropriate our proprietary information and cause interruptions of our IT services. Because the techniques used by unauthorized persons to access or sabotage networks change frequently and may not be recognized until launched against a target, we may be unable to anticipate these techniques. Further, if unauthorized access or sabotage remains undetected for an extended period of time, the effects of such breach could be exacerbated. In addition, sophisticated hardware and operating system software and applications that we produce or procure from third parties may contain defects in design or manufacture, including &#8220;bugs&#8221; and other problems that could unexpectedly interfere with the operation of the system. Our exposure to cybersecurity threats and negative consequences of cybersecurity breaches will likely increase as our vCloud Air business expands and we store increasing amounts of customer data and host or manage parts of customers&#8217; businesses in cloud-based IT environments.We have also outsourced a number of our business functions to third party contractors, and our business operations also depend, in part, on the success of our contractors&#8217; own cybersecurity measures. We also use third parties to provide colocation services (i.e. data center services) for our hybrid cloud offering. Similarly, we rely upon distributors, resellers, system vendors and systems integrators to sell our products and our sales operations depend, in part, on the reliability of their cybersecurity measures. Additionally, we depend upon our employees to appropriately handle confidential data and deploy our IT resources in safe and secure fashion that does not expose our network systems to security breaches and the loss of data. Accordingly, if our cybersecurity systems and those of our contractors, partners and vendors fail to protect against unauthorized access, sophisticated cyberattacks and the mishandling of data by our employees, contractors, partners or vendors, our ability to conduct our business effectively could be damaged in a number of ways, including: &#8226;sensitive data regarding our business, including intellectual property and other proprietary data, could be stolen;&#8226;our electronic communications systems, including email and other methods, could be disrupted, and our ability to conduct our business operations could be seriously damaged until such systems can be restored and secured;&#8226;our ability to process customer orders and electronically deliver products and services could be degraded, and our distribution channels could be disrupted, resulting in delays in revenue recognition;&#8226;defects and security vulnerabilities could be exploited or introduced into our software products or our hybrid cloud offering, thereby damaging the reputation and perceived reliability and security of our products and services and potentially making the data systems of our customers vulnerable to further data loss and cyber incidents; and&#8226;personally identifiable or confidential data of our customers, employees and business partners could be stolen or lost.Should any of the above events occur, we could be subject to significant claims for liability from our customers, regulatory actions from governmental agencies, our ability to protect our intellectual property rights could be compromised and our reputation and competitive position could be significantly harmed. Also, the regulatory and contractual actions, litigations, investigations, fines, penalties and liabilities relating to data breaches that result in losses of personally identifiable or credit card information of users of our services can be significant in terms of fines and reputational impact, and necessitate changes to our business operations that may be disruptive to us. Additionally, we could incur significant costs in order to upgrade our cybersecurity systems and remediate damages. Consequently, our financial performance and results of operations could be adversely affected.
CONTENT_20:
Our products and services are highly technical and complex and, when deployed, have contained and may contain errors, defects or security vulnerabilities. Some errors in our products or services may only be discovered after a product or service has been installed and used by customers. Any errors, defects or security vulnerabilities discovered in our products or services after commercial release could result in loss of revenues or delay in revenue recognition, loss of customers and increased service and warranty cost, any of which could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. Undiscovered vulnerabilities in our products or services could expose them to hackers or other unscrupulous third parties who develop and deploy viruses, worms, and other malicious software programs that could attack our products or services. In the past,&#160;VMware has been made aware of public postings by hackers of portions of our source code. It is possible that the released source code could expose unknown security vulnerabilities in our products and services that could be exploited by hackers or others. We may also inherit unknown security vulnerabilities when we integrate the products or services of companies that we acquire into existing and new VMware products or services. Actual or perceived security vulnerabilities in our products or services could harm our reputation and lead some customers to return products or services, to reduce or delay future purchases or to use competitive products or services. End users, who rely on our products and services for the interoperability of enterprise servers and applications that are critical to their information systems, may have a greater sensitivity to product errors and security vulnerabilities than customers for software products generally. Any security breaches could lead to interruptions, delays and data loss and protection concerns. By their nature, security breaches are often difficult to detect and the failure to detect a breach for an extended period of time could 22Table of Contentssignificantly increase the damage it could cause. In addition, we could face claims for product liability, tort or breach of warranty, including claims relating to changes to our products and services made by our channel partners. Our contracts with customers contain provisions relating to warranty disclaimers and liability limitations, which may not be upheld, and customers and channel partners may seek indemnification from us for their losses and those of their customers. Defending a lawsuit, regardless of its merit, is costly and time-consuming and may divert management&#8217;s attention and adversely affect the market&#8217;s perception of us and our products and services. In addition, if our business liability insurance coverage proves inadequate or future coverage is unavailable on acceptable terms or at all, our business, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely impacted.
CONTENT_21:
Revenues from customers outside the United States comprised approximately 52% of our total revenues in the years ended 2014&#32;and 2013. We have sales, administrative, research and development and technical support personnel in numerous countries worldwide. We expect to continue to add personnel in additional countries. Additionally, our investment portfolio includes investments in non-U.S. financial instruments and holdings in non-U.S. financial institutions, including European institutions. Our international operations subject us to a variety of risks, including:&#8226;the difficulty of managing and staffing international offices and the increased travel, infrastructure and legal compliance costs associated with multiple international locations;&#8226;increased exposure to foreign currency exchange rate risk;&#8226;difficulties in enforcing contracts and collecting accounts receivable, and longer payment cycles, especially in emerging markets;&#8226;difficulties in delivering support, training and documentation in certain foreign markets;&#8226;tariffs and trade barriers and other regulatory or contractual limitations on our ability to sell or develop our products and services in certain foreign markets;&#8226;economic or political instability and security concerns in countries that are important to our international sales and operations;&#8226;macroeconomic disruptions, such as monetary and credit crises, that can threaten the stability of local and regional financial institutions and decrease the value of our international investments;&#8226;the overlap of different tax structures or changes in international tax laws;&#8226;reduced protection for intellectual property rights, including reduced protection from software piracy, in some countries;&#8226;difficulties in transferring funds from certain countries; and&#8226;difficulties in maintaining appropriate controls relating to revenue recognition practices.Additionally, as we continue to expand our business globally, we will need to maintain compliance with legal and regulatory requirements covering the foreign activities of U.S. corporations, such as export control requirements and the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, as well as with local regulatory requirements in non-U.S. jurisdictions. These risks will increase as we expand our operations to locations with a higher incidence of corruption and fraudulent business practices. Our success will depend, in large part, on our ability to anticipate and effectively manage these and other risks associated with our international operations. We expect a significant portion of our growth to occur in foreign countries, which can add to the difficulties in maintaining adequate management and compliance systems and internal controls over financial reporting, and increase challenges in managing an organization operating in various countries. In addition, potential fallout from recent disclosures related to the&#160;U.S. Internet and communications&#160;surveillance could also make foreign customers reluctant to purchase cloud computing products and services from U.S.-based companies and impair our growth rate in foreign markets.Our failure to manage any of these risks successfully could negatively affect our reputation, limit our growth, harm our operations and reduce our international sales.
CONTENT_22:
As part of the natural lifecycle of our products and services, we periodically inform customers that products or services will be reaching their end of life or end of availability and will no longer be supported or receive updates and security patches. To the extent these products or services remain subject to a service contract with the customer, we offer to transition the customer to alternative products or services. Failure to effectively manage our product and service lifecycles could lead to 23Table of Contentscustomer dissatisfaction, and contractual liabilities, which could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, operating results and cash flow.
CONTENT_23:
Our products interoperate with Windows, Linux and other operating systems and the hardware devices of numerous manufacturers. Developing products that interoperate properly requires substantial partnering, capital investment and employee resources, as well as the cooperation of the vendors and developers of the operating systems and hardware. Operating system and hardware vendors may not provide us with early access to their technology and products, assist us in these development efforts or share with or sell to us any application programming interfaces, or APIs, formats or protocols we may need. If they do not provide us with the necessary early access, assistance or proprietary technology on a timely basis, we may experience product development delays or be unable to expand our products into other areas. To the extent that software or hardware vendors develop products that compete with ours or those of our controlling stockholder, EMC Corporation (&#8220;EMC&#8221;), they may have an incentive to withhold their cooperation, decline to share access or sell to us their proprietary APIs, protocols or formats, or engage in practices to actively limit the functionality, compatibility and certification of our products. To the extent that we enter into collaborations or joint development and marketing arrangements with certain hardware and software vendors, vendors who compete with our collaborative partners may similarly choose to limit their cooperation with us. In addition, hardware or operating system vendors may fail to certify or support or continue to certify or support our products for their systems. If any of the foregoing occurs, our product development efforts may be delayed or foreclosed and our business and results of operations may be adversely affected.
CONTENT_24:
Our future success is highly dependent upon maintaining and increasing the number of our relationships with distributors, resellers, system vendors and systems integrators. Because we rely on distributors, resellers, system vendors and systems integrators, we may have little or no contact with the ultimate users of our products and services, thereby making it more difficult for us to establish brand awareness, ensure proper delivery and installation of our products and services, service ongoing customer requirements, estimate end-user demand and respond to evolving customer needs.Recruiting and retaining qualified channel partners and training them in the use of our technology and product offerings requires significant time and resources. In order to develop and expand our distribution channel, we must continue to expand and improve our processes and procedures that support our channel, including our investment in systems and training, and those processes and procedures may become increasingly complex and difficult to manage. The time and expense required for sales and marketing organizations of our channel partners to become familiar with our product and service offerings, including our new product and service developments, may make it more difficult to introduce those products and services to end users and delay end-user adoption of our product and service offerings.We generally do not have long-term contracts or minimum purchase commitments with our distributors, resellers, system vendors and systems integrators, and our contracts with these channel partners do not prohibit them from offering products or services that compete with ours. Our competitors may be effective in providing incentives to existing and potential channel partners to favor products and services of our competitors or to prevent or reduce sales of our products and services. Certain system vendors now offer competing virtualization products pre-installed on their server products and services. Additionally, our competitors could attempt to require key distributors to enter into exclusivity arrangements with them or otherwise apply their pricing or marketing leverage to discourage distributors from offering our products and services. Accordingly, our channel partners may choose not to offer our products and services exclusively or at all. Our failure to maintain and increase the number of relationships with channel partners would likely lead to a loss of end users of our products and services, which would result in us receiving lower revenues from our channel partners. Three&#32;of our distributors each accounted for 10% or more of our consolidated revenues during the year ended&#32;of 2014. Our agreements with distributors are typically terminable by either party upon 30 to 90 days&#8217; prior written notice to the other party, and neither party has any obligation to purchase or sell any products or services under the agreements. While we believe that we have in place, or would have in place by the date of any such termination, agreements with replacement distributors sufficient to maintain our revenues from distribution, if we were to lose the distribution services of a significant distributor, such loss could have a negative impact on our results of operations until such time as we arrange to replace these distribution services with the services of existing or new distributors.24Table of Contents
CONTENT_25:
Three&#32;of our distributors each accounted for 10% or more of our consolidated revenues during the year ended&#32;of 2014. We anticipate that sales of our products to a limited number of distributors will continue to account for a significant portion of our total product revenues for the foreseeable future. The concentration of product sales among certain distributors increases our potential credit risks. For example, approximately 42%&#32;of our total accounts receivable as of December&#160;31, 2014&#32;was from these three&#32;distributors. Some of our distributors may experience financial difficulties, which could adversely impact our collection of accounts receivable. One or more of these distributors could delay payments or default on credit extended to them. Our exposure to credit risks of our distributors may increase if our distributors and their customers are adversely affected by global or regional economic conditions. Additionally, we provide credit to distributors, resellers, and certain end-user customers in the normal course of business. Credit is generally extended to new customers based upon a credit evaluation. Credit is extended to existing customers based on ongoing credit evaluations, prior payment history, and demonstrated financial stability. We often allow distributors and customers to purchase and receive shipments of products in excess of their established credit limit. We are unable to recognize revenues from such shipments until the collection of those amounts becomes reasonably assured. Any significant delay or default in the collection of significant accounts receivable could result in an increased need for us to obtain working capital from other sources, possibly on worse terms than we could have negotiated if we had established such working capital resources prior to such delays or defaults. Any significant default could result in a negative impact on our results of operations and delay our ability to recognize revenue.
CONTENT_26:
From time to time, we are involved in various legal, administrative and regulatory proceedings, claims, demands and investigations relating to our business, which may include claims with respect to commercial, product liability, intellectual property, employment, class action, whistleblower and other matters. In the ordinary course of business, VMware also receives inquiries from and has discussions with government entities regarding the compliance of its contracting and sales practices with laws and regulations. Such matters can be time-consuming, divert management&#8217;s attention and resources and cause us to incur significant expenses. While no formal legal proceedings that we expect to have a material impact on our financial condition or results of operations have been commenced, there can be no assurance that actions will not be taken in the future, and final resolution of such claims could be materially different from our current estimates. Furthermore, because litigation and the outcome of regulatory proceedings are inherently unpredictable, it is possible that our business, financial condition or results of operations could be negatively affected by an unfavorable resolution of one or more of such proceedings, claims, demands or investigations.&#32;
CONTENT_27:
Our business is subject to federal, state and international laws and regulations regarding privacy and protection of personal data. As Internet commerce continues to evolve, regulation by federal, state and foreign governments or agencies in the areas of data privacy and data security is likely to increase. Other nations have data privacy laws that, in some respects, are more stringent than privacy standards in the United States. As we expand our operations in these countries, our liability exposure and the complexity and cost of compliance with data and privacy requirements will likely increase. We collect contact and other personal or identifying information from our customers. Additionally, in connection with some of our product initiatives, including our web-based services, mobile services and our vCloud Air offering, we expect that our customers may increasingly use our services to store and process personal information and other regulated data. We post, on our websites, and, where appropriate, within our products, our privacy policies and practices concerning our treatment of personal data. We also often include privacy commitments in our contracts. Any failure by us to comply with our posted privacy policies, other federal, state or international privacy-related or data protection laws and regulations, or the privacy commitments contained in our contracts could result in proceedings against us by governmental entities or others, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, the increased attention focused upon liability issues as a result of lawsuits and legislative proposals could harm our reputation or otherwise impact the growth of our business. It is possible that these laws and regulations may be interpreted and applied in a manner that is inconsistent with our data practices. If so, in addition to the possibility of fines and penalties, a governmental order requiring that we change our data practices could result, which in turn could have a material adverse effect on our business. Compliance with such an order may involve significant costs or require changes in business practices that result in reduced revenues. Noncompliance could result in penalties being imposed on us or we could be ordered to cease conducting the noncompliant activity.In addition to government regulation, privacy advocacy and industry groups or other third parties may propose new and different self-regulatory standards that either legally or contractually apply to our customers or us. Any inability to adequately 25Table of Contentsaddress privacy concerns, even if unfounded, or comply with applicable privacy or data protection laws, regulations and standards, could result in additional cost and liability to us, damage our reputation, reduce sales and harm our business. Additionally, our virtualization technology is used by cloud computing vendors, and we have expanded our involvement in the delivery and provision of cloud computing through business alliances with various providers of cloud computing services and software and expect to continue to do so in the future. The application of U.S. and international data privacy laws to cloud computing vendors is uncertain, and our existing contractual provisions may prove to be inadequate to protect us from claims for data loss or regulatory noncompliance made against cloud computing providers who we may partner with. Accordingly, the failure to comply with data protection laws and regulations by our customers and business partners who provide cloud computing services could have a material adverse effect on our business.Since some of our products and services are web-based, our customers store their data on our servers and our vendors&#8217; servers. This data may include personal data. It may also include protected health information (&#8220;PHI&#8221;) that may be subject to federal, state and international health care privacy, data privacy or security laws, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (&#8220;HIPAA&#8221;). HIPAA has been amended by the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (&#8220;HITECH Act&#8221;) with the result of increased civil penalties. As a result of HIPAA and the HITECH Act, business associates who have access to PHI provided by covered entities and other business associates are now directly subject to HIPAA. When our customers place PHI into our web-based services, including vCloud Air or our services hosted on our vCloud Air, we may be required to comply with HIPAA&#8217;s data security requirements and may be liable for sanctions and penalties for failure to do so. Any systems failure or compromise of our security that results in the release of our customers&#8217; data could (i) subject us to substantial damage claims from our customers, (ii) expose us to costly regulatory remediation, and (iii) harm our reputation and brand. We may also need to expend significant resources to protect against security breaches.
CONTENT_28:
Our contracts with our customers may include unique and specialized performance requirements. In particular, our contracts with federal, state, local and non-U.S. governmental customers and our arrangements with distributors and resellers who may sell directly to governmental customers are subject to various procurement regulations, contract provisions and other requirements relating to their formation, administration and performance. Any failure by us to comply with provisions in our customer contracts or any violation of government contracting regulations could result in the imposition of various civil and criminal penalties, which may include termination of contracts, forfeiture of profits, suspension of payments and, in the case of our government contracts, fines and suspension from future government contracting. Further, any negative publicity related to our customer contracts or any proceedings surrounding them, regardless of its accuracy, may damage our business and affect our ability to compete for new contracts. In the ordinary course of business, we also receive inquiries from and have ongoing discussions with government entities regarding the compliance of our contracting and sales practices with laws and regulations. We continue to cooperate with the U.S. General Services Administration and the Department of Justice in their inquiries regarding our government sales practices between 2006 and 2013. During the second quarter of 2014, we recognized a liability of approximately $11 million in connection with this matter as the loss was determined to be both probable and reasonably estimable. While no formal legal proceedings have been commenced, final resolution of the matter could result in liability materially different from the accrued amount, and there can be no assurance that actions will not be commenced in the future. If our customer contracts are terminated, if we are suspended from government work or fines or other government sanctions are imposed, or if our ability to compete for new contracts is adversely affected, our business, operating results or financial condition could be adversely affected.&#32;
CONTENT_29:
We depend on our ability to protect our proprietary technology. We rely on trade secret, patent, copyright and trademark laws and confidentiality agreements with employees and third parties, all of which offer only limited protection. As such, despite our efforts, the steps we have taken to protect our proprietary rights may not be adequate to preclude misappropriation of our proprietary information or infringement of our intellectual property rights, and our ability to police such misappropriation or infringement is uncertain, particularly in countries outside of the United States. Further, with respect to patent rights, we do not know whether any of our pending patent applications will result in the issuance of patents or whether the examination process will require us to narrow our claims. To the extent that additional patents are issued from our patent applications, which are not certain, they may be contested, circumvented or invalidated in the future. Moreover, the rights granted under any issued patents may not provide us with proprietary protection or competitive advantages, and, as with any technology, competitors may be able to develop similar or superior technologies to our own now or in the future. In addition, we rely on confidentiality or license agreements with third parties in connection with their use of our products and technology. There is no guarantee that such parties will abide by the terms of such agreements or that we will be able to adequately enforce our rights, in part because we rely on &#8220;click-wrap&#8221; and &#8220;shrink-wrap&#8221; licenses in some instances.26Table of ContentsDetecting and protecting against the unauthorized use of our products, technology proprietary rights, and intellectual property rights is expensive, difficult and, in some cases, impossible. Litigation may be necessary in the future to enforce or defend our intellectual property rights, to protect our trade secrets or to determine the validity and scope of the proprietary rights of others. Such litigation could result in substantial costs and diversion of management resources, either of which could harm our business, financial condition and results of operations, and there is no guarantee that we would be successful. Furthermore, many of our current and potential competitors have the ability to dedicate substantially greater resources to protecting their technology or intellectual property rights than we do. Accordingly, despite our efforts, we may not be able to prevent third parties from infringing upon or misappropriating our intellectual property, which could result in a substantial loss of our market share.
CONTENT_30:
Our success and ability to compete depend substantially upon our internally developed technology, which in some cases is incorporated in the source code for our products. We seek to protect the source code, design code, documentation and other information relating to our software, under trade secret, copyright, and other applicable laws. However, we have chosen to provide access to our hypervisor and other selected source code to several dozen of our partners for co-development, as well as for open APIs, formats and protocols. Though we generally control access to our source code and other intellectual property, and enter into confidentiality or license agreements with such partners, as well as with our employees and consultants, this combination of procedural and contractual safeguards may be insufficient to protect our trade secrets and other rights to our technology. Our protective measures may be inadequate, especially because we may not be able to prevent our partners, employees or consultants from violating any agreements or licenses we may have in place or abusing their access granted to our source code. Improper disclosure or use of our source code could help competitors develop products similar to or better than ours.
CONTENT_31:

CONTENT_32:

CONTENT_33:
Several of our product offerings are distributed under open source licenses. Software solutions that are substantially or mostly based on open source software subject us to a number of risks and challenges:&#8226;If open source software programmers, most of whom we do not employ, do not continue to develop and enhance open source technologies, our development expenses could be increased and our product release and upgrade schedules could be delayed.&#8226;One of the characteristics of open source software is that anyone can modify the existing software or develop new software that competes with existing open source software. As a result, competition can develop without the degree of overhead and lead time required by traditional proprietary software companies. It is also possible for new competitors with greater resources than ours to develop their own open source solutions, potentially reducing the demand for, and putting price pressure on, our solutions.&#8226;It is possible that a court could hold that the licenses under which our open source products and services are developed and licensed are not enforceable or that someone could assert a claim for proprietary rights in a program developed and distributed under them. Any ruling by a court that these licenses are not enforceable, or that open source components of our product or services offerings may not be liberally copied, modified or distributed, may have the effect of preventing us from distributing or developing all or a portion of our products or services. In addition, licensors of open source software employed in our offerings may, from time to time, modify the terms of their license agreements in such a manner that those license terms may no longer be compatible with other open source licenses in our offerings or our end-user license agreement or terms of service, and thus could, among other consequences, prevent us from continuing to distribute the software code subject to the modified license or terms of service.28Table of Contents&#8226;Actions to protect and maintain ownership and control over our intellectual property could adversely affect our standing in the open source community, which in turn could limit our ability to continue to rely on this community, upon which we are dependent, as a resource to help develop and improve our open source products and services.If we are unable to successfully address the challenges of integrating offerings based upon open source technology into our business, our ability to realize revenues from such offerings will be negatively affected and our development costs may increase.
CONTENT_34:
We have acquired in the past and plan to acquire in the future other businesses, products or technologies. Acquisitions can involve significant risks and uncertainties, which include:&#8226;disrupting our ongoing operations, diverting management from day-to-day responsibilities, increasing our expenses, and adversely impacting our business, financial condition and results of operations; &#8226;failure of the acquired business to further our business strategy; &#8226;uncertainties in achieving the expected benefits of an acquisition, including enhanced revenues, technology, human resources, cost savings, operating efficiencies and other synergies;&#8226;reducing cash available for operations, stock repurchase programs and other uses and resulting in potentially dilutive issuances of equity securities or the incurrence of debt;&#8226;incurring amortization expense related to identifiable intangible assets acquired that could impact our operating results; &#8226;difficulty integrating the operations, systems, technologies, products and personnel of the acquired businesses effectively; &#8226;retaining and motivating key personnel from acquired companies; &#8226;assuming the liabilities of the acquired business, including acquired litigation-related liabilities, and potential litigation arising from a proposed or completed acquisition;&#8226;maintaining good relationships with customers or business partners of the acquired business or our own customers as a result of any integration of operations;&#8226;product liability, customer liability or intellectual property liability associated with the sale of the acquired business&#8217;s products;&#8226;unidentified issues not discovered during the diligence process, including issues with the acquired business&#8217;s intellectual property, product quality, security, privacy practices, accounting practices or legal contingencies;&#8226;maintaining or establishing acceptable standards, controls, procedures or policies with respect to the acquired business; and&#8226;risks relating to the challenges and costs of closing a transaction.Additionally, we may not be able to find suitable acquisition candidates, and we may not be able to complete acquisitions on favorable terms, if at all. If we do complete acquisitions, we may not ultimately strengthen our competitive position or achieve our goals, or they may be viewed negatively by customers, financial markets or investors. If our acquisitions do not meet our expectations, or if our strategic focus subsequently changes, we may choose to abandon certain acquired product lines and divest from acquired businesses. For example, in 2013, we divested certain business activities, including SlideRocket, Shavlik, and Zimbra. It is generally difficult for an acquirer to completely recover the cost of an acquisition which is subsequently divested. Accordingly, divestitures of acquired businesses and products may result in us taking charges for impairment of assets and goodwill, and result in cash expenditures in connection with headcount reductions.The risks described above may be exacerbated as a result of managing multiple acquisitions at the same time. We may also face difficulties due to the lack of experience in new markets, products or technologies or the initial dependence on unfamiliar supply or distribution partners. In addition to business acquisitions, we also seek to invest in businesses such as venture financed companies and joint ventures that offer complementary products, services or technologies. These investments are accompanied by risks similar to those encountered in an acquisition of a business. Additionally, we do not control entities where we have a minority investment, and therefore cannot ensure that these investments and joint ventures will make decisions that promote or are complementary to our business strategy.29Table of Contents
CONTENT_35:
We may not realize all the economic benefit from our acquisitions of other companies, which could result in an impairment of goodwill or intangibles. During 2014, our goodwill balance increased by $938 million&#32;or 31%&#32;primarily as a result of acquisitions made during the year. We review our amortizable intangible assets for impairment when events or changes in circumstances indicate the carrying value may not be recoverable. We test goodwill for impairment at least annually. Factors that may be considered a change in circumstances, indicating that the carrying value of our goodwill or amortizable intangible assets may not be recoverable, include a decline in stock price and market capitalization or cash flows, reduced future cash flow estimates, and slower growth rates in our industry. We may be required to record a significant charge in our financial statements during the period in which any impairment of our goodwill or amortizable intangible assets is determined, negatively impacting our results of operations.
CONTENT_36:
In order to comply with the requirements of Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, we need to maintain our processes and systems and adapt them to changes in our business requirements and regulation. We may seek to automate certain processes to improve efficiencies and better ensure ongoing compliance but such automation may itself disrupt existing internal controls and introduce unintended vulnerability to error or fraud. This continuous process of maintaining and adapting our internal controls and compliance with Section 404 is expensive and time-consuming, and requires significant management attention. We cannot be certain that our internal control measures will continue to provide adequate control over our financial processes and reporting and ensure compliance with Section 404. Furthermore, as our business grows and changes and as we expand through acquisitions of other companies, our internal controls may become more complex and we will require significantly more resources to ensure our internal controls overall remain effective. Failure to implement required new or improved controls, or difficulties encountered in their implementation, could harm our operating results or cause us to fail to meet our reporting obligations. If we or our independent registered public accounting firm identify material weaknesses, the disclosure of that fact, even if quickly remedied, could reduce the market&#8217;s confidence in our financial statements and harm our stock price. In addition, if we are unable to continue to comply with Section 404, our non-compliance could subject us to a variety of administrative sanctions, including the suspension or delisting of our Class A common stock from the New York Stock Exchange and the inability of registered broker-dealers to make a market in our Class A common stock, which could reduce our stock price.
CONTENT_37:
We rely on our information systems and those of third parties for processing customer orders, delivery of products, providing services and support to our customers, billing and tracking our customers, fulfilling contractual obligations and otherwise running our business. If our systems fail, our disaster recovery planning and capacity may prove insufficient to enable timely recovery of important functions and business records. Any disruption in our information systems and those of the third parties upon whom we rely could have a significant impact on our business. In addition, we continuously work to enhance our information systems. The implementation of these types of enhancements is frequently disruptive to the underlying business of an enterprise, which may especially be the case for us due to the size and complexity of our business. Additionally, our information systems may not support new business models and initiatives and significant investments could be required in order to upgrade them. Any disruptions relating to our systems enhancements, particularly any disruptions impacting our operations during the implementation period, could adversely affect our business in a number of respects. Additionally, delays in adapting our information systems to address new business models could limit the success or result in the failure of such initiatives and impair the effectiveness of our internal controls. Even if we do not encounter these adverse effects, the implementation of these enhancements may be much more costly than we anticipated. If we are unable to successfully implement the information systems enhancements as planned, our financial condition, results of operations and cash flows could be negatively impacted.
CONTENT_38:
&#32;As a multinational corporation, we are subject to income taxes as well as non-income based taxes, such as payroll, sales, use, value-added, net worth, property and goods and services taxes, in both the United States and various foreign jurisdictions. Our domestic and international tax liabilities are subject to the allocation of revenues and expenses in different jurisdictions and the timing of recognizing revenues and expenses. Additionally, the amount of income taxes paid is subject to our interpretation of applicable tax laws in the jurisdictions in which we file and changes to tax laws. Significant judgment is required in determining our worldwide provision for income taxes and other tax liabilities. From time to time, we are subject to income and non-income tax examinations. Currently, the EMC consolidated tax group is under federal income tax audit for 2009 and 30Table of Contents2010 and the audit is not expected to be completed until 2015. While we believe we have complied with all applicable income tax laws, there can be no assurance that a governing tax authority will not have a different interpretation of the law and assess us with additional taxes. Should we be assessed with additional taxes, there could be a material adverse effect on our financial condition or results of operations. Our future effective tax rate may be affected by such factors as changes in tax laws, our business, rates, changing interpretation of existing laws or regulations, the impact of accounting for stock-based compensation, the impact of accounting for business combinations, and shifts in the amount of earnings in the U.S. compared with other regions in the world as well as the expiration of statute of limitations and settlements of audits, changes in our international organization, and changes in overall levels of income before tax. For example, the U.S. federal research credit, which provided a significant reduction in our effective tax rate, expired on December 31, 2014. Without the reinstatement of the U.S. federal research credit, we expect our 2015 effective tax rate to be higher than the 2014 effective tax rate.In addition, in the ordinary course of our global business, there are many intercompany transactions and calculations where the ultimate tax determination is uncertain. Although we believe that our tax estimates are reasonable, we cannot ensure that the final determination of tax audits or tax disputes will not be different from what is reflected in our historical income tax provisions and accruals.Additionally, our rate of taxation in foreign jurisdictions is lower than the U.S. tax rate. Our international income is primarily earned by our subsidiaries organized in Ireland and as such, our effective tax rate can be impacted by the mix of our earnings in the U.S. and foreign jurisdictions.   During October 2014, Ireland announced revisions to its tax regulations that will require foreign earnings earned by our subsidiaries organized in Ireland to be taxed at higher rates. We will be impacted by the changes in tax regulations in Ireland beginning in 2021. Additionally, the U.S. and other countries where we do business have been considering changes to existing tax laws. These potential changes could also adversely affect our effective tax rate.
CONTENT_39:
Our corporate headquarters are located in the San Francisco Bay Area, a region known for seismic activity. A significant natural disaster, such as an earthquake, fire, flood or other act of God, could have a material adverse impact on our business, financial condition and results of operations. As we continue to grow internationally, increasing amounts of our business will be located in foreign countries that may be more subject to political or social instability that could disrupt operations. Furthermore, some of our new product initiatives and business functions are hosted and carried out by third parties that may be vulnerable to disruptions of these sorts, many of which may be beyond our control. In addition, our servers are vulnerable to computer viruses, break-ins and similar disruptions from unauthorized tampering with our computer systems. Unanticipated disruptions in services provided through localized physical infrastructure, such as utility or telecommunication outages, can curtail the functioning of local offices as well as critical components of our information systems, and adversely affect our ability to process orders, provide services, respond to customer requests and maintain local and global business continuity. Natural disasters that affect the manufacture of IT products can also delay customer spending on our software, which is often coupled with customer purchases of new servers and IT systems. Furthermore, acts of terrorism or war could cause disruptions in our or our customers&#8217; business or the economy as a whole, and disease pandemics could temporarily sideline a substantial part of our or our customers&#8217; workforce at any particular time. To the extent that such disruptions result in delays or cancellations of customer orders, or the deployment or availability of our products and services, our revenues would be adversely affected. Additionally, any such catastrophic event could cause us to incur significant costs to repair damages to our facilities, equipment and infrastructure.
CONTENT_40:
We prepare our consolidated financial statements in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. These principles are subject to interpretation by the SEC and various bodies formed to interpret and create appropriate accounting principles and guidance. A change in these principles or guidance, or in their interpretations, may have a significant effect on our reported results and retroactively affect previously reported results. For example, during May 2014, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (&#8220;FASB&#8221;) issued Accounting Standards Update (&#8220;ASU&#8221;) No. 2014-09, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606). The updated standard is effective for us in the first quarter of 2017. We have not selected a transition method and are currently evaluating the effect that the updated standard will have on our consolidated financial statements and related disclosures. 31Table of Contents
CONTENT_41:

CONTENT_42:
As of December&#160;31, 2014, EMC owned 43,025,000&#32;shares of our Class A common stock and all 300,000,000&#32;shares of our Class B common stock, representing 79.9%&#32;of the total outstanding shares of common stock or 97.2%&#32;of the voting power of outstanding common stock. The holders of our Class A common stock and our Class B common stock have identical rights, preferences and privileges except with respect to voting and conversion rights, the election of directors, certain actions that require the consent of holders of Class B common stock and other protective provisions as set forth in our certificate of incorporation. Holders of our Class B common stock are entitled to 10 votes per share of Class B common stock on all matters except for the election of our Group II directors, in which case they are entitled to one vote per share, and the holders of our Class A common stock are entitled to one vote per share of Class A common stock. The holders of Class B common stock, voting separately as a class, are entitled to elect 80% of the total number of directors on our board of directors that we would have if there were no vacancies on our board of directors at the time. These are our Group I directors. Subject to any rights of any series of preferred stock to elect directors, the holders of Class A common stock and the holders of Class B common stock, voting together as a single class, are entitled to elect our remaining directors, which at no time will be less than one director-our Group II director(s). Accordingly, the holders of our Class B common stock currently are entitled to elect 8 of our 9 directors.Our amended and restated certificate of incorporation provides that, if EMC transfers shares of our Class B common stock to any party other than a successor-in-interest or a subsidiary of EMC prior to a distribution to its stockholders under Section 355 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (a &#8220;355 distribution&#8221;), those shares will automatically convert into Class A common stock. Additionally, if, prior to a 355 distribution, EMC&#8217;s ownership falls below 20% of the outstanding shares of our common stock, all outstanding shares of Class B common stock will automatically convert to Class A common stock. Following a 355 distribution, shares of Class B common stock may convert to Class A common stock if such conversion is approved by VMware stockholders after the 355 distribution and we have obtained a private letter ruling from the Internal Revenue Service. In January 2014, the IRS announced in Revenue Procedure 2014-3 that, generally, it would no longer issue private letter rulings on 355 distributions. For so long as EMC or its successor-in-interest beneficially owns shares of our common stock representing at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the holders of outstanding voting stock, EMC will be able to elect all of the members of our board of directors. To the extent that shares of our Class B common stock remain outstanding following a 355 distribution, these shares will remain entitled to 10 votes per share and the holders of our Class A common stock will continue to have limited ability to influence matters requiring stockholder approval. Furthermore, to the extent that shares of our Class B common stock remain outstanding following a 355 distribution, holders of these shares will remain entitled to elect 80% of the total number of directors on our board of directors and the holders of our Class A common stock will continue to have limited ability to elect members of our board of directors.In addition, until such time as EMC or its successor-in-interest beneficially owns shares of our common stock representing less than a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the holders of outstanding voting stock, EMC will have the ability to take stockholder action without the vote of any other stockholder and without having to call a stockholder meeting, and holders of our Class A common stock will not be able to affect the outcome of any stockholder vote during this period. As a result, EMC will have the ability to control all matters affecting us, including:&#8226;the composition of our board of directors and, through our board of directors, any determination with respect to our business plans and policies;&#8226;any determinations with respect to mergers, acquisitions and other business combinations;&#8226;our acquisition or disposition of assets;&#8226;our financing activities;&#8226;certain changes to our certificate of incorporation;&#8226;changes to the agreements we entered into in connection with our transition to becoming a public company;&#8226;corporate opportunities that may be suitable for us and EMC;&#8226;determinations with respect to enforcement of rights we may have against third parties, including with respect to intellectual property rights;&#8226;the payment of dividends on our common stock; and&#8226;the number of shares available for issuance under our stock plans for our prospective and existing employees.Our certificate of incorporation and the master transaction agreement entered into between us and EMC in connection with our initial public offering (&#8220;IPO&#8221;) also contain provisions that require that as long as EMC beneficially owns at least 20% or 32Table of Contentsmore of the outstanding shares of our common stock, the prior affirmative vote or written consent of EMC (or its successor-in-interest) as the holder of the Class B common stock is required (subject in each case to certain exceptions) in order to authorize us to:&#8226;consolidate or merge with any other entity;&#8226;acquire the stock or assets of another entity in excess of $100 million;&#8226;issue any stock or securities except to our subsidiaries or pursuant to our employee benefit plans;&#8226;establish the aggregate annual amount of shares we may issue in equity awards;&#8226;dissolve, liquidate or wind us up;&#8226;declare dividends on our stock;&#8226;enter into any exclusive or exclusionary arrangement with a third party involving, in whole or in part, products or services that are similar to EMC&#8217;s; and&#8226;amend, terminate or adopt any provision inconsistent with certain provisions of our certificate of incorporation or bylaws.If EMC does not provide any requisite consent allowing us to conduct such activities when requested, we will not be able to conduct such activities and, as a result, our business and our operating results may be harmed. EMC&#8217;s voting control and its additional rights described above may discourage transactions involving a change of control of us, including transactions in which holders of our Class A common stock might otherwise receive a premium for their shares over the then-current market price. EMC is not prohibited from selling a controlling interest in us to a third party and may do so without the approval of the holders of our Class A common stock and without providing for a purchase of any shares of Class A common stock held by persons other than EMC. Accordingly, shares of Class A common stock may be worth less than they would be if EMC did not maintain voting control over us or if EMC did not have the additional rights described above.In the event EMC is acquired or otherwise undergoes a change of control, any acquirer or successor will be entitled to exercise the voting control and contractual rights of EMC, and may do so in a manner that could vary significantly from EMC&#8217;s historic practice.By becoming a stockholder in our company, holders of our Class A common stock are deemed to have notice of and have consented to the provisions of our certificate of incorporation and the master transaction agreement with respect to the limitations that are described above.
CONTENT_43:

CONTENT_44:

CONTENT_45:

CONTENT_46:

CONTENT_47:
Beneficial ownership of at least 80% of the total voting power is required in order for EMC to affect a tax-free spin-off of VMware or certain other tax-free transactions. We have agreed that for so long as EMC or its successor-in-interest continues to own greater than 50% of the voting control of our outstanding common stock, we will not knowingly take or fail to take any action that could reasonably be expected to preclude EMC&#8217;s or its successor-in-interest&#8217;s ability to undertake a tax-free spin-off. Additionally, under our certificate of incorporation and the master transaction agreement we entered into with EMC, we must obtain the consent of EMC or its successor-in-interest, as the holder of our Class B common stock, to issue stock or other VMware securities, except pursuant to employee benefit plans (provided that we obtain Class B common stockholder approval of the aggregate annual number of shares to be granted under such plans), which could cause us to forgo capital raising or acquisition opportunities that would otherwise be available to us. As a result, we may be precluded from pursuing certain growth initiatives.
CONTENT_48:
Third parties may seek to hold us responsible for EMC&#8217;s liabilities. Under our master transaction agreement with EMC, EMC will indemnify us for claims and losses relating to liabilities related to EMC&#8217;s business and not related to our business. However, if those liabilities are significant and we are ultimately held liable for them, we cannot be certain that we will be able to recover the full amount of our losses from EMC.
CONTENT_49:
We have historically been included in EMC&#8217;s consolidated group for U.S. federal income tax purposes, as well as in certain consolidated, combined or unitary groups that include EMC Corporation or certain of its subsidiaries for state and local income tax purposes. Pursuant to our tax sharing agreement with EMC, we and EMC generally will make payments to each other such that, with respect to tax returns for any taxable period in which we or any of our subsidiaries are included in EMC&#8217;s consolidated group for U.S. federal income tax purposes or any other consolidated, combined or unitary group of EMC Corporation or its subsidiaries, the amount of taxes to be paid by us will be determined, subject to certain adjustments, as if we and each of our subsidiaries included in such consolidated, combined or unitary group filed our own consolidated, combined or unitary tax return.We have been included in the EMC consolidated group for U.S. federal income tax purposes since our acquisition by EMC, and expect to continue to be included in such consolidated group for periods in which EMC owns at least 80% of the total voting power and value of our outstanding stock. Each member of a consolidated group during any part of a consolidated return year is jointly and severally liable for tax on the consolidated return of such year and for any subsequently determined deficiency thereon. Similarly, in some jurisdictions, each member of a consolidated, combined or unitary group for state, local or foreign income tax purposes is jointly and severally liable for the state, local or foreign income tax liability of each other 34Table of Contentsmember of the consolidated, combined or unitary group. Accordingly, for any period in which we are included in the EMC consolidated group for U.S. federal income tax purposes or any other consolidated, combined or unitary group of EMC Corporation and/or its subsidiaries, we could be liable in the event that any income tax liability was incurred, but not discharged, by any other member of any such group.
CONTENT_50:
Disputes may arise between EMC and us in a number of areas relating to our ongoing relationships, including:&#8226;labor, tax, employee benefit, indemnification and other matters arising from our separation from EMC;&#8226;our reseller arrangements with EMC;&#8226;employee retention and recruiting;&#8226;business combinations involving us;&#8226;our ability to engage in activities with certain channel, technology or other marketing partners;&#8226;sales or dispositions by EMC of all or any portion of its ownership interest in us;&#8226;the nature, quality and pricing of services EMC has agreed to provide us or we have agreed to provide to EMC;&#8226;arrangements with third parties that are exclusionary to EMC;&#8226;arrangements with EMC for collaborative product or technology development, marketing and sales activities involving our technology, employees and other resources;&#8226;business opportunities that may be attractive to both EMC and us; and&#8226;product or technology development or marketing activities or customer agreements which may require the consent of EMC.We may not be able to resolve any potential conflicts, and even if we do, the resolution may be less favorable than if we were dealing with an unaffiliated party.The agreements we enter into with EMC may be amended upon agreement between the parties. While we are controlled by EMC, we may not have the leverage to negotiate amendments to these agreements if required on terms as favorable to us as those we would negotiate with an unaffiliated third party.
CONTENT_51:

CONTENT_52:

CONTENT_53:

CONTENT_54:
The financial information covering the periods included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K does not necessarily reflect what our financial condition, results of operations or cash flows would have been had we been a completely independent entity during those periods. In certain geographic regions where we do not have an established legal entity, we contract with EMC subsidiaries for support services and EMC personnel who are managed by us. The costs incurred by EMC on our behalf related to these employees are passed on to us and we are charged a mark-up intended to approximate costs that would have been charged had we contracted for such services with an unrelated third party. These costs are included as expenses in our consolidated statements of income. Additionally, we and EMC engage in intercompany transactions, including agreements regarding the use of EMC&#8217;s and our intellectual property and real estate, agreements regarding the sale of goods and services to one another and to Pivotal, and an agreement for EMC to resell our products and services to third party customers. If EMC were to distribute its shares of our common stock to its stockholders or otherwise divest itself of all or a significant portion of its VMware shares,&#160;there would be numerous implications to VMware, including the fact that VMware would lose the benefit of these arrangements with EMC. There can be no assurance that VMware would be able to renegotiate these arrangements with EMC or replace them on the same or similar terms. Additionally, our business could face significant disruption and uncertainty as we transition from these arrangements with EMC. Moreover, our historical financial information is not necessarily indicative of what our financial condition, results of operations or cash flows will be in the future if and when we contract at arm&#8217;s length with independent third parties for the services we have received and currently receive from EMC. During the year ended&#32;December&#160;31, 2014, we recognized revenues of $318 million, and as of December&#160;31, 2014, $317 million&#32;of sales were included in unearned revenues from such transactions with EMC. For additional information, see &#8220;Management&#8217;s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations&#8221; and our consolidated financial statements and notes thereto.
CONTENT_55:

CONTENT_56:
The trading price of our Class A common stock has fluctuated significantly since our IPO in August 2007. For example, between January&#160;1,&#160;2014 and December 31, 2014, the closing trading price of our Class A common stock was volatile, ranging between $76.43&#32;and $111.80&#32;per share. Our trading price could fluctuate substantially in the future due to the factors discussed in this Risk Factors section and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.Substantial amounts of Class A common stock are held by our employees and EMC, and all of the shares of our Class B common stock, which may be converted to Class A common stock upon request of the holder, are held by EMC. Shares of Class A common stock held by EMC (including shares of Class A common stock that might be issued upon the conversion of Class B common stock) are eligible for sale subject to the volume, manner of sale and other restrictions of Rule 144 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the &#8220;Securities Act&#8221;), which allows the holder to sell up to the greater of 1% of our 36Table of Contentsoutstanding Class A common stock or our four-week average weekly trading volume during any three-month period and following the expiration of their contractual restrictions. Additionally, EMC possesses registration rights with respect to the shares of our common stock that it holds. If EMC chooses to exercise such rights, its sale of the shares that are registered would not be subject to the Rule 144 limitations. Additionally, the provisions of our charter documents and the agreements that we entered into with EMC prior to our IPO enable EMC to elect to distribute all of its holdings of our Class A and Class B common stock to EMC stockholders and require us to register the shares so they could be resold in the public trading markets. If a significant amount of the shares that become eligible for resale enter the public trading markets in a short period of time, the market price of our Class A common stock may decline. Additionally, if our Class B common stock is distributed to EMC stockholders and remains outstanding, it would trade separately from and potentially at a premium to our Class A common stock, and could thereby contribute additional volatility to the price of our Class A common stock. Additionally, broad market and industry factors may decrease the market price of our Class A common stock, regardless of our actual operating performance. The stock market in general and technology companies in particular have often experienced extreme price and volume fluctuations. In addition, in the past, following periods of volatility in the overall market and the market price of a company&#8217;s securities, securities class action litigation has often been instituted, including against us, and, if not resolved swiftly, can result in substantial costs and a diversion of management&#8217;s attention and resources.
CONTENT_57:
The trading market for our Class A common stock is influenced by the research and reports that industry or securities analysts publish about us, our business, our market or our competitors. If any of the analysts who cover us change their recommendation regarding our stock adversely, or provide more favorable relative recommendations about our competitors, our stock price would likely decline.
CONTENT_58:
Provisions in our certificate of incorporation and bylaws will have the effect of delaying or preventing a change of control or changes in our management. These provisions include the following:&#8226;the division of our board of directors into three classes, with each class serving for a staggered three-year term, which prevents stockholders from electing an entirely new board of directors at any annual meeting;&#8226;the right of the board of directors to elect a director to fill a vacancy created by the expansion of the board of directors;&#8226;following a 355 distribution of Class B common stock by EMC to its stockholders, the restriction that a beneficial owner of 10% or more of our Class B common stock may not vote in any election of directors unless such person or group also owns at least an equivalent percentage of Class A common stock or obtains approval of our board of directors prior to acquiring beneficial ownership of at least 5% of Class B common stock;&#8226;the prohibition of cumulative voting in the election of directors or any other matters, which would otherwise allow less than a majority of stockholders to elect director candidates;&#8226;the requirement for advance notice for nominations for election to the board of directors or for proposing matters that can be acted upon at a stockholders&#8217; meeting;&#8226;the ability of the board of directors to issue, without stockholder approval, up to 100,000,000 shares of preferred stock with terms set by the board of directors, which rights could be senior to those of common stock; and&#8226;in the event that EMC or its successor-in-interest no longer owns shares of our common stock representing at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast in the election of directors, stockholders may not act by written consent and may not call special meetings of the stockholders.Until such time as EMC or its successor-in-interest ceases to beneficially own 20% or more of the outstanding shares of our common stock, the affirmative vote or written consent of the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of the Class B common stock will be required to:&#8226;amend certain provisions of our bylaws or certificate of incorporation;&#8226;make certain acquisitions or dispositions;&#8226;declare dividends, or undertake a recapitalization or liquidation;&#8226;adopt any stockholder rights plan, &#8220;poison pill&#8221; or other similar arrangement;37Table of Contents&#8226;approve any transactions that would involve a merger, consolidation, restructuring, sale of substantially all of our assets or any of our subsidiaries or otherwise result in any person or entity obtaining control of us or any of our subsidiaries; or&#8226;undertake certain other actions.In addition, we have elected to apply the provisions of Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law. These provisions may prohibit large stockholders, in particular those owning 15% or more of our outstanding voting stock, from merging or combining with us. These provisions in our certificate of incorporation and bylaws and under Delaware law could discourage potential takeover attempts and could reduce the price that investors might be willing to pay for shares of our common stock.</div
